Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-824
Council of State Governments declared a joint governmental agency.

The Council of State Governments is declared to be a joint governmental agency of this state and of the other states which cooperate through it.

Laws 1937, c. 110, § 9, p. 409;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-7309;

R.S.1943, § 81-824.